Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-531
Unlawful transportation; delay in proceedings; intervention by lienor or owner of vehicle.

When it appears that any undue delay will result in the disposition of the criminal proceedings against the person or persons arrested, the owner or lienor of any vehicle seized as provided in sections 66-527 to 66-530 may be proceeded against in the manner prescribed in section 66-530. The court shall not allow the claim or lien of any person or persons who, prior to the time the vehicle was seized, knew, should have known, or had good cause to believe that the vehicle was being used or would be or was likely to be used for the unlawful transportation of motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel. In all cases the burden of proof shall be on such claimants to show that they did not know, should not have known, and did not have good cause to believe that such vehicle was being used or would be or was likely to be used for the unlawful transportation of motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel.

Laws 1933, c. 47, § 2, p. 260;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-423;

R.S.1943, § 66-438;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-438;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 34;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 66-4,112;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 93.